Illinois, session 104th, HB1727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Section 1-170 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-170 new)7    Sec. 1-170. Suspension of benefits; felony indictment or 8charge. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 9benefit or annuity payments to a member or participant in a 10retirement system or pension fund established under this Code 11shall be suspended if the member or participant is indicted or 12charged by information with a felony and the board of the 13retirement system or pension fund determines that the felony 14relates to or arises out of or in connection with his or her 15service as a member or participant of the retirement system or 16pension fund. If the member or participant is not convicted of 17that felony, payment of the benefit or annuity shall resume 18and the retirement system or pension fund shall pay to the 19member or participant the amount of the suspended annuity or 20benefit payments with interest, at a rate determined by the 21board of the retirement system or pension fund. If the member 22or participant is convicted of that felony, the suspended 23annuity or benefit payments shall not be paid to the member or   HB1727- 2 -LRB104 03114 RPS 13135 b1participant; however, the member or participant shall be 2entitled to a refund of his or her contributions as provided in 3the applicable provisions concerning forfeiture of benefits 4for certain felony convictions. This Section applies without 5regard to whether the member or participant first became a 6member or participant of a retirement system or pension fund 7before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 8General Assembly. 9    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 10Section 8.49 as follows: 11    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)12    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 138 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 14the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 15Act of the 104th General Assembly. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.